Utah statutes.
26-18-403.   Medicaid waiver for independent foster care adolescents.

(1)  For purposes of this section, an "independent foster care adolescent" includes any individual who reached 18 years of age while in the custody of the Division of Child and Family Services, or the Department of Human Services if the Division of Child and Family Services was the primary case manager, or a federally recognized Indian tribe.

(2)  An independent foster care adolescent is eligible, when funds are available, for Medicaid coverage until the individual reaches 21 years of age.

(3)  Before July 1, 2006, the division shall submit a state Medicaid Plan amendment to the Center For Medicaid Services to provide medical coverage for independent foster care adolescents effective fiscal year 2006-07.



Enacted by Chapter 110, 2006 General Session

